src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Gothic language verbs inflect in persons.


LEXICON st/eigan__V
! Ia
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:áig # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:igum # ;
+Act+PrfPrc:igans # ;


LEXICON b/airan__V
! IVb
+Inf:aíran # ;
+Act+PrsPrc:aírands # ;
+Act+PrfPrc:aúrans # ;

+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:aíra # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:aíris # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:aíriþ # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Du1:aírōs # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Du2:aírats # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:aíram # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:aíriþ # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:aírand # ;

+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:ar # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:art # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:ar # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Du1:ēru # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Du2:ēruts # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:ērum # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:ēruþ # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:ērun # ;

+Act+Sbj+Prs+Sg1:aíráu # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prs+Sg2:aíráis # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prs+Sg3:aírái # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prs+Du1:aíráwa # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prs+Du2:aíráits # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prs+Pl1:aíráima # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prs+Pl2:aíráiþ # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prs+Pl3:aíráina # ;

+Act+Sbj+Prt+Sg1:ērjáu # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prt+Sg2:ēreis # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prt+Sg3:ēri # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prt+Du1:ēreiwa # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prt+Du2:ēreits # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prt+Pl1:ēreima # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prt+Pl2:ēreiþ # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prt+Pl3:ēreina # ;

+Act+Imprt+Sg2:aír # ;
+Act+Imprt+Sg3:aíradáu # ;
+Act+Imprt+Du2:aírats # ;
+Act+Imprt+Pl1:aíram # ;
+Act+Imprt+Pl2:aíriþ # ;
+Act+Imprt+Pl3:aírandáu # ;

+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1:aírada # ;
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2:aíraza # ;
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3:aírada # ;
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1:aíranda # ;
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2:aíranda # ;
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3:aíranda # ;

+Pss+Sbj+Prs+Sg1:aíráidáu # ;
+Pss+Sbj+Prs+Sg2:aíráizáu # ;
+Pss+Sbj+Prs+Sg3:aíráidáu # ;
+Pss+Sbj+Prs+Pl1:aíráindáu # ;
+Pss+Sbj+Prs+Pl2:aíráindáu # ;
+Pss+Sbj+Prs+Pl3:aíráindáu # ;

!!
LEXICON nas/jan__V
! I weak
+Inf:jan # ;
+Act+PrsPrc:jands # ;
+Act+PrfPrc:iþs # ;

+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:ja # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:jis # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:jiþ # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Du1:jōs # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Du2:jats # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:jam # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:jiþ # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:jand # ;

+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:ida # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:idēs # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:ida # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Du1:idēdu # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Du2:idēduts # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:idēdum # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:idēduþ # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:idēdun # ;

+Act+Sbj+Prs+Sg1:jáu # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prs+Sg2:jáis # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prs+Sg3:jái # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prs+Du1:jáiwa # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prs+Du2:jáits # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prs+Pl1:jáima # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prs+Pl2:jáiþ # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prs+Pl3:jáina # ;

+Act+Sbj+Prt+Sg1:idēdjáu # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prt+Sg2:idēdeis # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prt+Sg3:idēdi # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prt+Du1:idēdeiwa # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prt+Du2:idēdeits # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prt+Pl1:idēdeima # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prt+Pl2:idēdeiþ # ;
+Act+Sbj+Prt+Pl3:idēdeina # ;

+Act+Imprt+Sg2:ei # ;
+Act+Imprt+Sg3:jadáu # ;
+Act+Imprt+Du2:jats # ;
+Act+Imprt+Pl1:jam # ;
+Act+Imprt+Pl2:jiþ # ;
+Act+Imprt+Pl3:jandáu # ;

+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1:jada # ;
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2:jaza # ;
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3:jada # ;
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1:janda # ;
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2:janda # ;
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3:janda # ;

+Pss+Sbj+Prs+Sg1:jáidáu # ;
+Pss+Sbj+Prs+Sg2:jáizáu # ;
+Pss+Sbj+Prs+Sg3:jáidáu # ;
+Pss+Sbj+Prs+Pl1:jáindáu # ;
+Pss+Sbj+Prs+Pl2:jáindáu # ;
+Pss+Sbj+Prs+Pl3:jáindáu # ;




! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
