src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
!! Verbs
!  -----
!! Verbs in the Gothic language are actions.

LEXICON Verbs
verb    Persons   ;
steigan+V:st st/eigan__V "Ia ascend" ;

baíran+V:b b/airan__V "IVb bear" ;

nasjan+V:nas nas/jan__V "save" ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
